District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.19

Receipt and disbursement of payments.

(a)

A support enforcement agency or tribunal of the District shall disburse promptly any amounts received pursuant to a support order, as directed by the order. The agency or tribunal shall furnish to a requesting party or tribunal of another state a certified statement by the custodian of the record of the amounts and dates of all payments received.

(b)

If neither the obligor, nor the obligee who is an individual, nor the child resides in the District, upon request from the support enforcement agency of the District or another state, a support enforcement agency of the District or a tribunal of the District shall:

(1)

Direct that the support payment be made to the support enforcement agency in the state in which the obligee is receiving services; and

(2)

Issue and send to the obligor’s employer a conforming income-withholding order or an administrative notice of change of payee, reflecting the redirected payments.

(c)

The support enforcement agency of the District receiving redirected payments from another state pursuant to a law similar to subsection (b) of this section shall furnish to a requesting party or tribunal of the other state a certified statement by the custodian of the record of the amount and dates of all payments received.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 318, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 319, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(19), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-303.07.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.18.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.18

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsecs. (b) and (c).

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 319 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).